hyphenate_patterns/hyph-es-es.tex
% copyright: Copyright (C) 1993, 1997 Javier Bezos, 2001-2019 Javier Bezos, CervanTeX
% title: Hyphenation patterns for Spanish
% notice: This file is part of the hyph-utf8 package.
%     See http://www.hyphenation.org/tex for more information.
% language:
%     name: Spanish
%     tag: es
% version: 5.0 2019-09-24
% authors:
%   -
%     name: Javier Bezos
% licence:
%     name: MIT/X11
%     url: https://opensource.org/licenses/MIT
%     text: >
%         Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person obtaining a copy
%         of this software and associated documentation files (the "Software"), to deal
%         in the Software without restriction, including without limitation the rights
%         to use, copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense, and/or sell
%         copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the Software is
%         furnished to do so, subject to the following conditions:
%
%         The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in
%         all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
%
%         THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED â€œAS ISâ€, WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR
%         IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY,
%         FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NONINFRINGEMENT. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE
%         AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER
%         LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING FROM,
%         OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER DEALINGS IN THE
%         SOFTWARE.
% hyphenmins:
%     typesetting:
%         left: 2
%         right: 2
% texlive:
%     synonyms:
%         - espanol
%     encoding: ec
%     babelname: spanish
%     legacy_patterns: eshyph.tex
%     message: Spanish hyphenation patterns
%     description: Hyphenation patterns for Spanish in T1/EC and UTF-8 encodings.
% ==========================================
%
% For further info, bug reports and comments:
%
%       https://github.com/jbezos/tex-hyphen-spanish
%
% I would like to thanks Francesc Carmona for his permission
% to steal parts of his work without restrictions. For his
% patterns, (c) by Francesc Carmona
%
%
%
% _____________________________________________________________
% Javier Bezos                | http://www.cervantex.es/
% .............................................................
% TeX y tipografia            | http://www.texnia.com/
%
\patterns{
1b 4b. .b2 2bb 2bc 2bd 2bf 2bg 2bh 2bj 2bk     2bm 2bn 2bp 2bq     2bs 2bt 2bv 2bw 2bx 2by 2bz
1c 4c. .c2 2cb 2cc 2cd 2cf 2cg     2cj 2ck     2cm 2cn 2cp 2cq     2cs 2ct 2cv 2cw 2cx 2cy 2cz
1d 4d. .d2 2db 2dc 2dd 2df 2dg 2dh 2dj 2dk 2dl 2dm 2dn 2dp 2dq     2ds 2dt 2dv 2dw 2dx 2dy 2dz
1f 4f. .f2 2fb 2fc 2fd 2ff 2fg 2fh 2fj 2fk     2fm 2fn 2fp 2fq     2fs 2ft 2fv 2fw 2fx 2fy 2fz
1g 4g. .g2 2gb 2gc 2gd 2gf 2gg 2gh 2gj 2gk     2gm 2gn 2gp 2gq     2gs 2gt 2gv 2gw 2gx 2gy 2gz
   4h. 2hb 2hc 2hd 2hf 2hg 2hh 2hj 2hk 2hl 2hm 2hn 2hp 2hq 2hr 2hs 2ht 2hv 2hw 2hx 2hy 2hz
1j 4j. .j2 2jb 2jc 2jd 2jf 2jg 2jh 2jj 2jk 2jl 2jm 2jn 2jp 2jq 2jr 2js 2jt 2jv 2jw 2jx 2jy 2jz
1k 4k. .k2 2kb 2kc 2kd 2kf 2kg 2kh 2kj 2kk     2km 2kn 2kp 2kq     2ks 2kt 2kv 2kw 2kx 2ky 2kz
1l 4l. .l2 2lb 2lc 2ld 2lf 2lg 2lh 2lj 2lk     2lm 2ln 2lp 2lq 2lr 2ls 2lt 2lv 2lw 2lx 2ly 2lz
1m 4m. .m2 2mb 2mc 2md 2mf 2mg 2mh 2mj 2mk 2ml 2mm 2mn 2mp 2mq 2mr 2ms 2mt 2mv 2mw 2mx 2my 2mz
1n 4n. .n2 2nb 2nc 2nd 2nf 2ng 2nh 2nj 2nk 2nl 2nm 2nn 2np 2nq 2nr 2ns 2nt 2nv 2nw 2nx 2ny 2nz
1p 4p. .p2 2pb 2pc 2pd 2pf 2pg 2ph 2pj 2pk     2pm 2pn 2pp 2pq     2ps 2pt 2pv 2pw 2px 2py 2pz
1q 4q. .q2 2qb 2qc 2qd 2qf 2qg 2qh 2qj 2qk 2ql 2qm 2qn 2qp 2qq 2qr 2qs 2qt 2qv 2qw 2qx 2qy 2qz
1r 4r. .r2 2rb 2rc 2rd 2rf 2rg 2rh 2rj 2rk 2rl 2rm 2rn 2rp 2rq     2rs 2rt 2rv 2rw 2rx 2ry 2rz
1s 4s. .s2 2sb 2sc 2sd 2sf 2sg 2sh 2sj 2sk 2sl 2sm 2sn 2sp 2sq 2sr 2ss 2st 2sv 2sw 2sx 2sy 2sz
1t 4t. .t2 2tb 2tc 2td 2tf 2tg 2th 2tj 2tk     2tm 2tn 2tp 2tq         2tt 2tv 2tw     2ty    
1v 4v. .v2 2vb 2vc 2vd 2vf 2vg 2vh 2vj 2vk     2vm 2vn 2vp 2vq     2vs 2vt 2vv 2vw 2vx 2vy 2vz
1w 4w. .w2 2wb 2wc 2wd 2wf 2wg 2wh 2wj 2wk 2wl 2wm 2wn 2wp 2wq 2wr 2ws 2wt 2wv 2ww 2wx 2wy 2wz
1x 4x. .x2 2xb 2xc 2xd 2xf 2xg 2xh 2xj 2xk 2xl 2xm 2xn 2xp 2xq 2xr 2xs 2xt 2xv 2xw 2xx 2xy 2xz
1y 4y. .y2 2yb 2yc 2yd 2yf 2yg 2yh 2yj 2yk 2yl 2ym 2yn 2yp 2yq 2yr 2ys 2yt 2yv 2yw 2yx 2yy 2yz
1z 4z. .z2 2zb 2zc 2zd 2zf 2zg 2zh 2zj 2zk 2zl 2zm 2zn 2zp 2zq 2zr 2zs 2zt 2zv 2zw 2zx 2zy 2zz
1Ã± 4Ã±.
c4h 4ch. 2chb 2chc 2chd 2chf 2chg 2chh 2chj 2chk ch2l 2chm 2chn 2chp 2chq ch2r 2chs 2cht 2chv 2chw 2chx 2chy 2chz
l4l 4ll. 2llb 2llc 2lld 2llf 2llg 2llh 2llj 2llk 2lll 2llm 2lln 2llp 2llq 2llr 2lls 2llt 2llv 2llw 2llx 2lly 2llz
b2l 4bl. 2bl2b 2bl2c 2bl2d 2bl2f 2bl2g 2bl2h 2bl2j 2bl2k 2bl2l 2bl2m 2bl2n 2bl2p 2bl2q 2bl2r 2bl2s 2bl2t 2bl2v 2bl2w 2bl2x 2bl2y 2bl2z
c2l 4cl. 2cl2b 2cl2c 2cl2d 2cl2f 2cl2g 2cl2h 2cl2j 2cl2k 2cl2l 2cl2m 2cl2n 2cl2p 2cl2q 2cl2r 2cl2s 2cl2t 2cl2v 2cl2w 2cl2x 2cl2y 2cl2z
f2l 4fl. 2fl2b 2fl2c 2fl2d 2fl2f 2fl2g 2fl2h 2fl2j 2fl2k 2fl2l 2fl2m 2fl2n 2fl2p 2fl2q 2fl2r 2fl2s 2fl2t 2fl2v 2fl2w 2fl2x 2fl2y 2fl2z
g2l 4gl. 2gl2b 2gl2c 2gl2d 2gl2f 2gl2g 2gl2h 2gl2j 2gl2k 2gl2l 2gl2m 2gl2n 2gl2p 2gl2q 2gl2r 2gl2s 2gl2t 2gl2v 2gl2w 2gl2x 2gl2y 2gl2z
k2l 4kl. 2kl2b 2kl2c 2kl2d 2kl2f 2kl2g 2kl2h 2kl2j 2kl2k 2kl2l 2kl2m 2kl2n 2kl2p 2kl2q 2kl2r 2kl2s 2kl2t 2kl2v 2kl2w 2kl2x 2kl2y 2kl2z
p2l 4pl. 2pl2b 2pl2c 2pl2d 2pl2f 2pl2g 2pl2h 2pl2j 2pl2k 2pl2l 2pl2m 2pl2n 2pl2p 2pl2q 2pl2r 2pl2s 2pl2t 2pl2v 2pl2w 2pl2x 2pl2y 2pl2z
v2l 4vl. 2vl2b 2vl2c 2vl2d 2vl2f 2vl2g 2vl2h 2vl2j 2vl2k 2vl2l 2vl2m 2vl2n 2vl2p 2vl2q 2vl2r 2vl2s 2vl2t 2vl2v 2vl2w 2vl2x 2vl2y 2vl2z
b2r 4br. 2br2b 2br2c 2br2d 2br2f 2br2g 2br2h 2br2j 2br2k 2br2l 2br2m 2br2n 2br2p 2br2q 2br2r 2br2s 2br2t 2br2v 2br2w 2br2x 2br2y 2br2z
c2r 4cr. 2cr2b 2cr2c 2cr2d 2cr2f 2cr2g 2cr2h 2cr2j 2cr2k 2cr2l 2cr2m 2cr2n 2cr2p 2cr2q 2cr2r 2cr2s 2cr2t 2cr2v 2cr2w 2cr2x 2cr2y 2cr2z
d2r 4dr. 2dr2b 2dr2c 2dr2d 2dr2f 2dr2g 2dr2h 2dr2j 2dr2k 2dr2l 2dr2m 2dr2n 2dr2p 2dr2q 2dr2r 2dr2s 2dr2t 2dr2v 2dr2w 2dr2x 2dr2y 2dr2z
f2r 4fr. 2fr2b 2fr2c 2fr2d 2fr2f 2fr2g 2fr2h 2fr2j 2fr2k 2fr2l 2fr2m 2fr2n 2fr2p 2fr2q 2fr2r 2fr2s 2fr2t 2fr2v 2fr2w 2fr2x 2fr2y 2fr2z
g2r 4gr. 2gr2b 2gr2c 2gr2d 2gr2f 2gr2g 2gr2h 2gr2j 2gr2k 2gr2l 2gr2m 2gr2n 2gr2p 2gr2q 2gr2r 2gr2s 2gr2t 2gr2v 2gr2w 2gr2x 2gr2y 2gr2z
k2r 4kr. 2kr2b 2kr2c 2kr2d 2kr2f 2kr2g 2kr2h 2kr2j 2kr2k 2kr2l 2kr2m 2kr2n 2kr2p 2kr2q 2kr2r 2kr2s 2kr2t 2kr2v 2kr2w 2kr2x 2kr2y 2kr2z
p2r 4pr. 2pr2b 2pr2c 2pr2d 2pr2f 2pr2g 2pr2h 2pr2j 2pr2k 2pr2l 2pr2m 2pr2n 2pr2p 2pr2q 2pr2r 2pr2s 2pr2t 2pr2v 2pr2w 2pr2x 2pr2y 2pr2z
r2r 4rr. 2rr2b 2rr2c 2rr2d 2rr2f 2rr2g 2rr2h 2rr2j 2rr2k 2rr2l 2rr2m 2rr2n 2rr2p 2rr2q 2rr2r 2rr2s 2rr2t 2rr2v 2rr2w 2rr2x 2rr2y 2rr2z
t2r 4tr. 2tr2b 2tr2c 2tr2d 2tr2f 2tr2g 2tr2h 2tr2j 2tr2k 2tr2l 2tr2m 2tr2n 2tr2p 2tr2q 2tr2r 2tr2s 2tr2t 2tr2v 2tr2w 2tr2x 2tr2y 2tr2z
v2r 4vr. 2vr2b 2vr2c 2vr2d 2vr2f 2vr2g 2vr2h 2vr2j 2vr2k 2vr2l 2vr2m 2vr2n 2vr2p 2vr2q 2vr2r 2vr2s 2vr2t 2vr2v 2vr2w 2vr2x 2vr2y 2vr2z
2b3p2t 2c3p2t 2d3p2t 2l3p2t 2m3p2t 2n3p2t 2r3p2t 2s3p2t 2t3p2t 2x3p2t 2y3p2t 4pt.
2b3c2t 2c3c2t 2d3c2t 2l3c2t 2m3c2t 2n3c2t 2r3c2t 2s3c2t 2t3c2t 2x3c2t 2y3c2t 4ct.
2b3c2n 2c3c2n 2d3c2n 2l3c2n 2m3c2n 2n3c2n 2r3c2n 2s3c2n 2t3c2n 2x3c2n 2y3c2n 4cn.
2b3p2s 2c3p2s 2d3p2s 2l3p2s 2m3p2s 2n3p2s 2r3p2s 2s3p2s 2t3p2s 2x3p2s 2y3p2s 4ps.
2b3m2n 2c3m2n 2d3m2n 2l3m2n 2m3m2n 2n3m2n 2r3m2n 2s3m2n 2t3m2n 2x3m2n 2y3m2n 4mn.
2b3g2n 2c3g2n 2d3g2n 2l3g2n 2m3g2n 2n3g2n 2r3g2n 2s3g2n 2t3g2n 2x3g2n 2y3g2n 4gn.
2b3f2t 2c3f2t 2d3f2t 2l3f2t 2m3f2t 2n3f2t 2r3f2t 2s3f2t 2t3f2t 2x3f2t 2y3f2t 4ft.
2b3p2n 2c3p2n 2d3p2n 2l3p2n 2m3p2n 2n3p2n 2r3p2n 2s3p2n 2t3p2n 2x3p2n 2y3p2n 4pn.
2b3c2z 2c3c2z 2d3c2z 2l3c2z 2m3c2z 2n3c2z 2r3c2z 2s3c2z 2t3c2z 2x3c2z 2y3c2z 4cz.
2b3t2z 2c3t2z 2d3t2z 2l3t2z 2m3t2z 2n3t2z 2r3t2z 2s3t2z 2t3t2z 2x3t2z 2y3t2z 4tz.
2b3t2s 2c3t2s 2d3t2s 2l3t2s 2m3t2s 2n3t2s 2r3t2s 2s3t2s 2t3t2s 2x3t2s 2y3t2s 4ts.
san4c5t
plan4c5t
com4p3t
prom4p3t
o1eu2
a1ae2
a1aÃ³2
eo1Ã¡2
eo1e2
o1ae2
o1eÃ³2
2no.
2t2l
2t2s
2t2x
2t2z
tz3s4ch
4caca4
4cago4
4caga4
4cagas.
4teta.
4tetas.
4puta4
4puto4
.hu4mea
.hu4meo
.he4mee
4meo.
4meable.
4meables.
4pedo4
4culo4
5mente.
4i3go.
4es.
4Ã©s
4e.
4e3mos.
4Ã©is.
4en.
4Ã­a.
4Ã­as.
4Ã­a3mos.
4Ã­ais.
4Ã­an.
4Ã­.
4Ã­4s3te.
4Ã­4s3tes.
4Ã­3tes.
4Ã­3mos.
4Ã­s3teis.
4e3rÃ©.
4e3rÃ¡s.
4e3rÃ©s.
4e3rÃ­s.
4e3rÃ¡.
4e3re3mos.
4e3rÃ©is.
4e3rÃ¡n.
4i3ga.
4i3gas.
4i3gÃ¡s.
4i3gamos.
4i3gÃ¡is.
4a4i3gan.
4e3rÃ­a.
4e3rÃ­as.
4e3rÃ­amos.
4e3rÃ­ais.
4e3rÃ­an.
4i3gÃ¡3mosme.
4i3gÃ¡3mosmele.
4i3gÃ¡3mosmelo.
4i3gÃ¡3mos3mela.
4i3gÃ¡3mosmeles.
4i3gÃ¡3mosmelos.
4i3gÃ¡3mos3melas.
4i3gÃ¡3moste.
4i3gÃ¡3mostele.
4i3gÃ¡3mostelo.
4i3gÃ¡3mos3tela.
4i3gÃ¡3mosteles.
4i3gÃ¡3mostelos.
4i3gÃ¡3mos3telas.
4i3gÃ¡3mosle.
4i3gÃ¡3mosla.
4i3gÃ¡3moslo.
4i3gÃ¡3mosele.
4i3gÃ¡3moselo.
4i3gÃ¡3mosela.
4i3gÃ¡3moseles.
4i3gÃ¡3moselos.
4i3gÃ¡3moselas.
4i3gÃ¡3monos.
4i3gÃ¡3monosle.
4i3gÃ¡3monoslo.
4i3gÃ¡3monosla.
4i3gÃ¡3monosles.
4i3gÃ¡3monoslos.
4i3gÃ¡3monoslas.
4i3gÃ¡3moos.
4i3gÃ¡3moosle.
4i3gÃ¡3mooslo.
4i3gÃ¡3moosla.
4i3gÃ¡3moosles.
4i3gÃ¡3mooslos.
4i3gÃ¡3mooslas.
4i3gÃ¡3mosles.
4i3gÃ¡3moslas.
4i3gÃ¡3moslos.
4ed.
4Ã©.
4edme.
4Ã©dmele.
4Ã©dmelo.
4Ã©d3mela.
4Ã©dmeles.
4Ã©dmelos.
4Ã©d3melas.
4edte.
4Ã©dtele.
4Ã©dtelo.
4Ã©d3tela.
4Ã©dteles.
4Ã©dtelos.
4Ã©d3telas.
4edle.
4eedla.
4edlo.
4Ã©dsele.
4Ã©dselo.
4Ã©dsela.
4Ã©dseles.
4Ã©dselos.
4Ã©dselas.
4ednos.
4Ã©dnosle.
4Ã©dnoslo.
4Ã©dnosla.
4Ã©dnosles.
4Ã©dnoslos.
4Ã©dnoslas.
4eos.
4Ã©osle.
4Ã©oslo.
4Ã©osla.
4Ã©osles.
4Ã©oslos.
4Ã©oslas.
4edles.
4edlas.
4edlos.
4er.
4erme.
4Ã©rmele.
4Ã©rmelo.
4Ã©r3mela.
4Ã©rmeles.
4Ã©rmelos.
4Ã©r3melas.
4erte.
4Ã©rtele.
4Ã©rtelo.
4Ã©r3tela.
4Ã©rteles.
4Ã©rtelos.
4Ã©r3telas.
4erle.
4erla.
4erlo.
4erse.
4Ã©rsele.
4Ã©rselo.
4Ã©rsela.
4Ã©rseles.
4Ã©rselos.
4Ã©rselas.
4ernos.
4Ã©rnosle.
4Ã©rnoslo.
4Ã©rnosla.
4Ã©rnosles.
4Ã©rnoslos.
4Ã©rnoslas.
4e3ros.
4Ã©3rosle.
4Ã©3roslo.
4Ã©3rosla.
4Ã©3rosles.
4Ã©3roslos.
4Ã©3roslas.
4erles.
4erlas.
4erlos.
4Ã­3do.
4Ã­3da.
4Ã­3dos.
4Ã­3das.
4o.
4as.
4a.
4Ã¡s.
4a3mos.
4Ã¡is.
4an.
4aste.
4astes.
4Ã³.
4ates.
4asteis.
4a3ron.
4a3ba.
4a3bas.
4Ã¡3bamos.
4a3bais.
4a3ban.
4a3rÃ­a.
4a3rÃ­as.
4a3rÃ­amos.
4a3rÃ­ais
4a3rÃ­an.
4a3rÃ©.
4a3rÃ¡s.
4a3rÃ©s.
4a3rÃ­s.
4a3rÃ¡.
4a3remos.
4a3rÃ©is.
4a3rÃ¡n.
4a3ra.
4a3ras.
4Ã¡3ramos.
4a3rais.
4a3ran.
4a3re.
4a3res.
4Ã¡3remos.
4a3reis.
4a3ren.
4a3se.
4a3ses.
4Ã¡3semos.
4a3seis.
4a3sen.
4ad.
e5r4as.
e5r4a3mos.
e5r4Ã¡is.
e5r4an.
e5r4aste.
e5r4astes.
e5r4ates.
e5r4asteis.
e5r4a3ron.
e5r4a3ba.
e5r4a3bas.
e5r4Ã¡3bamos.
e5r4a3bais.
e5r4a3ban.
e5r4a3rÃ­a.
e5r4a3rÃ­as.
e5r4a3rÃ­amos.
e5r4a3rÃ­ais
e5r4a3rÃ­an.
e5r4a3rÃ©.
e5r4a3rÃ¡s.
e5r4a3rÃ©s.
e5r4a3rÃ­s.
e5r4a3rÃ¡.
e5r4a3remos.
e5r4a3rÃ©is.
e5r4a3rÃ¡n.
e5r4a3ra.
e5r4a3ras.
e5r4Ã¡3ramos.
e5r4a3rais.
e5r4a3ran.
e5r4a3re.
e5r4a3res.
e5r4Ã¡3remos.
e5r4a3reis.
e5r4a3ren.
e5r4a3se.
e5r4a3ses.
e5r4Ã¡3semos.
e5r4a3seis.
e5r4a3sen.
e5r4ad.
4adme.
4Ã¡dmele.
4Ã¡dmelo.
4Ã¡d3mela.
4Ã¡dmeles.
4Ã¡dmelos.
4Ã¡d3melas.
4adte.
4Ã¡dtele.
4Ã¡dtelo.
4Ã¡d3tela.
4Ã¡dteles.
4Ã¡dtelos.
4Ã¡d3telas.
4adle.
4eadla.
4adlo.
4Ã¡dsele.
4Ã¡dselo.
4Ã¡dsela.
4Ã¡dseles.
4Ã¡dselos.
4Ã¡dselas.
4adnos.
4Ã¡dnosle.
4Ã¡dnoslo.
4Ã¡dnosla.
4Ã¡dnosles.
4Ã¡dnoslos.
4Ã¡dnoslas.
4aos.
4Ã¡osle.
4Ã¡oslo.
4Ã¡osla.
4Ã¡osles.
4Ã¡oslos.
4Ã¡oslas.
4adles.
4adlas.
4adlos.
4ar.
4a4rme.
4Ã¡4rmele.
4Ã¡4rmelo.
4Ã¡4r3mela.
4Ã¡4r3meles.
4Ã¡4r3melos.
4Ã¡4r3melas.
4a4r3te.
4Ã¡4r3tele.
4Ã¡4r3telo.
4Ã¡4r3tela.
4Ã¡4r3teles.
4Ã¡4r3telos.
4Ã¡4r3telas.
4a4r3le.
4a4r3la.
4a4r3lo.
4a4r3se.
4Ã¡4r3sele.
4Ã¡4r3selo.
4Ã¡4r3sela.
4Ã¡4r3seles.
4Ã¡4r3selos.
4Ã¡4r3selas.
4a4r3nos.
4Ã¡4r3nosle.
4Ã¡4r3noslo.
4Ã¡4r3nosla.
4Ã¡4r3nosles.
4Ã¡4r3noslos.
4Ã¡4r3noslas.
4a3ros.
4Ã¡rosle.
4Ã¡roslo.
4Ã¡rosla.
4Ã¡rosles.
4Ã¡roslos.
4Ã¡roslas.
4a4r3les.
4a4r3las.
4a4r3los.
4a3do.
4a3da.
4a3dos.
4a3das.
e5r4a3do.
e5r4a3da.
e5r4a3dos.
e5r4a3das.
4ando
4Ã¡ndole.
4Ã¡ndolo.
4Ã¡ndola.
4Ã¡ndoles.
4Ã¡ndolos.
4Ã¡ndolas.
4Ã¡ndonos.
4Ã¡ndoos.
4Ã¡ndome.
4Ã¡ndomelo.
4Ã¡ndomela.
4Ã¡ndomele.
4Ã¡ndomelos.
4Ã¡ndomelas.
4Ã¡ndomeles.
4Ã¡ndote.
4Ã¡ndoteme.
